Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-16] Health benefits plan; carriers. (a)
The board shall establish the health benefits plan or plans, which shall be
exempt from the minimum group requirements of chapter 431.

(b) The board may contract for health benefits
plans or provide health benefits through a noninsured schedule of benefits. [L
2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next